Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1043.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1401 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 1401. Definitions.--As used in this article--* * *(17) "Epinephrine delivery system" means a device approved by the Federal Food and Drug Administration that contains a premeasured dose of epinephrine and is used to administer 1234567891011121314151617181920 epinephrine into the human body to prevent or treat a life-threatening allergic reaction.Section 2. Sections 1414.1 heading, (a) and (b), 1414.2 and 1414.9 of the act are amended to read:Section 1414.1. Possession and Use of Asthma Inhalers and Epinephrine [Auto-Injectors] Delivery Systems.--(a) Each school entity shall develop a written policy to allow for the possession and self-administration by children of school age of asthma inhalers and epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems, and the prescribed medication to be administered thereby, in a school setting. The policy shall comply with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (Public Law 93-112, 29 U.S.C. § 794) and 22 Pa. Code Ch. 15 (relating to protected handicapped students). The policy shall be distributed with the code of student conduct required under 22 Pa. Code § 12.3(c) (relating to school rules) and made available on the school entity's publicly accessible Internet website, if any.(b) The policy under this section shall require a child of school age that desires to possess and self-administer an asthma inhaler or epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system in a school setting to demonstrate the capability for self-administration and for responsible behavior in the use thereof and to notify the school nurse immediately following each use of an asthma inhaler or epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system. The school entity shall develop a system whereby the child may demonstrate competency to the school nurse that the child is capable of self-administration and has permission for carrying and taking the medication through the use of the asthma inhaler or epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system. Determination of competency for self-administration shall be 20250HB1043PN1132 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 based on age, cognitive function, maturity and demonstration of responsible behavior. The school entity shall also restrict the availability of the asthma inhaler, the epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system and the prescribed medication contained therein from other children of school age. The policy shall specify conditions under which a student may lose the privilege to self-carry the asthma inhaler, the epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system and the medication if the school policies are abused or ignored. A school entity that prevents a student from self-carrying an asthma inhaler or epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system and the prescribed medication shall ensure that they are appropriately stored at locations in close proximity to the student prohibited from self-carrying and notify the student's classroom teachers of the places where the asthma inhaler or epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system and medication are to be stored and the means to access them.* * *Section 1414.2. School Access to Emergency Epinephrine.--(a) Subject to subsection (g), a school entity or nonpublic school may authorize a trained school employe to:(1) provide an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system that meets the prescription on file for either the individual student or the school entity or nonpublic school to a student who is authorized to self-administer an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system;(2) administer to a student an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system that meets the prescription on file for either the individual student or the school entity or nonpublic school; and(3) administer an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery 20250HB1043PN1132 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 system that meets the prescription on file for the school entity or nonpublic school to a student that the employe in good faith believes to be having an anaphylactic reaction.(b) Notwithstanding section 11 of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as "The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act," a physician or certified registered nurse practitioner may prescribe epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems in the name of the school entity or nonpublic school to be maintained for use pursuant to subsection (a).(c) A school entity or nonpublic school may maintain at a school in a safe, secure location a supply of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems.(d) A school entity or nonpublic school that authorizes the provision of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems under this section shall designate one or more individuals at each school who shall be responsible for the storage and use of the epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems.(e) Individuals who are responsible for the storage and use of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems must successfully complete a training program that shall be developed and implemented by the Department of Health within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this section.(f) (1) An epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system from the school entity's or nonpublic school's supply of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems that meets the prescription on file for the school entity or nonpublic school may be provided to and utilized by a student authorized to self-administer or may be administered by a trained school employe authorized to administer an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system to a student pursuant to subsection (a).20250HB1043PN1132 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) When a student does not have an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system or a prescription for an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system on file, a trained school employe may utilize the school entity's or nonpublic school's supply of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems to respond to anaphylactic reaction under a standing protocol from a physician or certified registered nurse practitioner and as provided in this section.(f.1) In the event a student is believed to be having an anaphylactic reaction, the school nurse or an individual in the school who is responsible for the storage and use of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems shall contact 911 as soon as possible.(g) At the request of a parent or legal guardian, a student shall be exempt from subsections (a), (f) and (h). The principal of the school in which the student is enrolled shall notify all parents or legal guardians of their ability to exempt their children from subsections (a), (f) and (h) by returning a signed opt-out form.(h) The provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 8332 (relating to emergency response provider and bystander good Samaritan civil immunity) and 8337.1 (relating to civil immunity of school officers or employees relating to emergency care, first aid and rescue) shall apply to a person who administers an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system pursuant to this section.(i) Administration of an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system under this section shall comply with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (Public Law 93-112, 29 U.S.C. § 794) and 22 Pa. Code Ch. 15 (relating to protected handicapped students).20250HB1043PN1132 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (j) As used in this section, "school entity" means a school district, intermediate unit, charter school, cyber charter school, regional charter school or area career and technical school.Section 1414.9. Administration of Epinephrine [Auto-injectors] D elivery Systems by School Bus Drivers and School Crossing Guards.--The provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 8332 (relating to emergency response provider and bystander good Samaritan civil immunity) and 8337.1 (relating to civil immunity of school officers or employees relating to emergency care, first aid and rescue) shall apply to a school bus driver and a school crossing guard when all of the following apply:(1) The school bus driver or school crossing guard administers an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system to a student in a manner consistent with the policies established by all of the following:(i) the independent contractor that employs the school bus driver or school crossing guard, if the school bus driver or school crossing guard is employed by an independent contractor;(ii) the school entity that has contracted with the independent contractor, if the school bus driver or school crossing guard is employed by an independent contractor; and(iii) the school entity that employs the school bus driver or school crossing guard, if the school bus driver or school crossing guard is employed by a school entity.(2) The school bus driver or school crossing guard has successfully completed a training program that shall be developed and implemented by the Department of Health. The Department of Health shall have ninety (90) days from the effective date of this section to develop and implement such a 20250HB1043PN1132 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 training program.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1043PN1132 - 7 - 12